Massachusetts, session 194th, H3686.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, Section 6 of 
Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, shall be amended by 
inserting after the word “section” in line 42 the following:- 
"However, the restoration of year of manufacture registration plates, painted and restored 
to their original year of manufacture colors and design, will not be considered altering such 
registration plates when used on antique automobiles."